Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Early Learning  and Care, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 53,847,979
(2) Early Learning Programs ......... $420,322,923
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds, corporate activity tax funds transferred from the Early Learning Ac-
count by the Department of Education and federal funds, collected or  received by the
Department of Early Learning and Care, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 7,109,409
(2) Early Learning Programs ......... $ 12,274,036
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal  funds collected or received by the Department of Early Learning
and Care, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 45,890,643
(2) Operations
- American Rescue Plan Act .... $ 15,480,804
(3) Early Learning Programs ......... $184,373,687
(4) Early Learning Programs
- American Rescue Plan Act .... $135,491,445
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses for  operations, grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the De-
partment of Early Learning and Care from corporate activity tax funds transferred from the
Early Learning Account by the Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 5,490,964
(2) Early learning programs ........... $432,122,205
Enrolled House Bill 5013 (HB 5013-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 7, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5013 (HB 5013-A) Page 2